Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201881-1848.03
Victim's rights; waiver.

Victim's rights under sections 81-1843 to 81-1851 may be waived by the victim at any time by (1) written consent, in person or by attorney, filed with the clerk of the court or (2) oral consent in open court entered on the record.

Laws 2004, LB 270, § 14;

Laws 2018, LB193, § 92.
July 19, 2018